Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 16 Community Health Centers

40-16-1.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 27, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 20, §§ 1, 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 431, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 459, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 36, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 33, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 133; P.L. 1999, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 181, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 341, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 482, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 483, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 32, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 35, § 1, effective July 1, 2006.

40-16-2.
Annual audit.

Any health center receiving funds by virtue of this chapter shall submit to an annual audit of its financial and other records required to substantiate reported numbers of patients served and visits provided, to be conducted by the state auditor general. The auditor general shall annually make a report of the results of the audit to the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the director of human services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 86.

40-16-3.
Open meetings.

The board of directors of each health center receiving funds pursuant to this section shall annually conduct an open meeting in each neighborhood where a satellite health center is located. Notice of the open meetings provided for above shall be given in accordance with chapter 46 of title 42 required for public bodies. The purpose of these annual open meetings shall be to allow the public to express their views about the services provided by the health centers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 26, § 1.

40-16-4.
Annual report.

Each health center receiving funds pursuant to this section shall submit an annual report on their expenditures, revenues, and patients served by health-center categories by October 1 of each year for the prior fiscal year to the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and director of human services.

History of Section.

P.L 1986, ch. 287, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 86.